Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-101
State Library; what constitutes.

The books, pamphlets, maps and charts belonging to the state, now in the State Library, or which shall hereafter be added to the same, shall constitute the State Library.

Laws 1871, § 1, p. 52;

R.S.1913, § 3777;

C.S.1922, § 3170;

C.S.1929, § 51-101;

R.S.1943, § 51-101.